South Dakota, session 2026, HB1008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. No later than September 30, 2026, the South Dakota Board of Education
Standards shall, pursuant to chapter 1-26, provide for and file with the secretary of state, the
amendment of § 24:43:11:02, as set forth below:
24:43:11:02. General requirements for high school graduation. The units of
credit number of credits required for high school graduation must include the following at
least:
(1) Four units or more credits of language arts that, which must include the following:
(a) One unit credit of writing;
(b) One-half unit credit of speech or debate; and
(c) One unit credit of literature that must include one-half unit credit of
American literature;
(2) Three units or more credits of social studies that, which must include the following:
(a) One unit credit of U.S. history; and
(b) One-half unit credit of U.S. government;
(3) Three units or more credits of mathematics that, which must include one unit credit
of algebra I;
(4) Three units or more credits of science that, which must include one unit of biology;
(5) One unit or more credit in any combination of the following:
(a) Approved career and technical education courses;
(b) A capstone experience; and
(c) World languages;
(6) One-half unit credit of personal finance or economics;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.112.14 2 1008
(7) One unit credit of fine arts;
(8) One-half unit credit of physical education;
(9) One-half unit credit of health or health integration; and
(10) Five and one-half units credits of electives.
A state-approved advanced computer science course may be substituted for one
unit credit of science, but may not be substituted for provided that the science course
being replaced is not biology.
Within the coursework outlined above, a student may earn one or more advanced
endorsement, but is not required to do so. A student may earn one or more of the following
advanced endorsements: advanced, advanced career, and advanced honors. Substitutions
for laboratory science, using a state-approved computer science course, do not apply to
the advanced and advanced honors endorsements.
Students A student may be granted up to one credit in fine arts for participation in
extracurricular activities. A maximum of one-fourth credit may be granted for each
extracurricular activity each school year. In order to grant credit, a district must document
the alignment of the activity with A student may be granted a maximum of one-fourth
credit for each extracurricular activity each school year. In order to grant credit, the school
district shall document how the extracurricular activity aligns with the fine arts content
standards as approved by the South Dakota Board of Education Standards.
A student may be granted up to one-half credit in physical education for
participation in school-sanctioned extracurricular varsity athletic activities. A student may
be granted a maximum of one-fourth credit for each extracurricular varsity athletic activity
each school year. In order to grant credit for participation in an extracurricular varsity
athletic activity, the school district shall document how the varsity athletic activity aligns
with the physical education standards approved by the South Dakota Board of Education
Standards.
Academic core content credit may be earned by completing an approved career
and technical education course. Approval to offer credit must be obtained through an
application process with the Department of Education. The application must include:
(1) Course syllabus;
(2) Standards based curriculum;
(3) Teacher certification;
(4) Assessment of standards by methods including end-of-course exams, authentic
assessment, project-based learning or rubrics a copy of the teacher's certification
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.112.14 3 1008
and a course syllabus that includes assessment standards and demonstrates that
curriculum is based on state content standards.
Source: 10 SDR 111, effective April 24, 1984; 11 SDR 96, 11 SDR 112, effective
July 1, 1985; 16 SDR 214, effective June 12, 1990; 23 SDR 31, effective September 8,
1996; 27 SDR 75, adopted January 17, 2001; 29 SDR 140, adopted April 1, 2003; 31 SDR
129, adopted March 2, 2005, effective July 1, 2009; transferred from § 24:03:06:06.01,
31 SDR 178, adopted May 4, 2005, effective July 1, 2005; 33 SDR 55, adopted September
11, 2006, effective September 1, 2007; 33 SDR 55, adopted September 11, 2006,
effective September 1, 2009; 36 SDR 96, effective December 8, 2009; 45 SDR 35,
effective September 19, 2018.
General Authority: SDCL 13-1-12.1, 13-3-47.
Law Implemented: SDCL 13-3-1.4, 13-33-1, 13-33-19.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.